Georgia, session 2025_26, HB74.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 27 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the "Georgia Lottery for
Education Act," is amended by revising paragraph (19) of subsection (a) of Code
Section 50-27-9, relating to general powers of the Georgia Lottery Corporation, as follows:
"(19) To adopt and amend such regulations, policies, and procedures as necessary to
carry out and implement its powers and duties, organize and operate the corporation,
regulate the conduct of lottery games in general, and any other matters necessary or
desirable for the efficient and effective operation of the lottery or the convenience of the
H. B. 74
- 1 -

LC 28 0645/AP
public. The promulgation of any such regulations, policies, and procedures pursuant to
this article and Article 2 of this chapter shall be exempt from the requirements of
Chapter 13 of this title, the 'Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.' Notwithstanding any
other provision of law to the contrary, (1) the promulgation of any form of licensure,
rules, regulations, policies, or procedures under Article 3 of this chapter, and (2) all
administrative hearings related to any dispute between licensees regarding Article 3 of
this chapter, except as otherwise specifically provided by law, shall be subject to and
governed by the provisions of Chapter 13 of this title. Hearings under Code Section
50-27-102 shall be held in accordance with the provisions of Part 1 of Article 1 of
Chapter 9 of Title 9, the 'Georgia Arbitration Code.' All other hearings and any rules,
regulations, policies, or procedures related to the administration, enforcement, or
violation of this article shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 13 of this title."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 74
- 2 -